udmrus.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY оаитенрсвйлпкьыяудмзшбчгщюжцёхфэъӝӧӵӥӟАВСМКГПТЕИЛФНДОЭРЗЮЯБХЖШЦУЧЬЫЪЩЙЁӦӴӤӞӜ

FLAG long

REP 20
REP э е
REP ко исько
REP ько исько
REP ко ӥсько
REP йос ъёс
REP е ьӧ
REP щ сь
REP ъи ӥ
REP дж ӝ
REP е ё
REP ыщ ись
REP ыщ ӥсь
REP е ӧ
REP ё о
REP ыщко исько
REP ыщко ӥсько
REP ъищ ӥсь
REP йэ е
REP йе е
REP о йё

MAP 8
MAP жӝ
MAP оӧ
MAP эӧ
MAP еӧ
MAP чӵ
MAP иӥ
MAP зӟ
MAP эе

SFX Ua Y 200 #-[^й]ыны
SFX Ua ыны он/Ud [^ьй]ыны
SFX Ua ыны оно [^ьй]ыны
SFX Ua ыны е [^дзлнстьйуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны	# [^дзлнстьйуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX Ua ыны елэ [^дзлнстьйуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX Ua ыны ем/Ud [^дзлнстьйуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX Ua ыны емед [^дзлнстьйуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX Ua ыны емын [^дзлнстьйуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX Ua ыны емен [^дзлнстьйуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX Ua ыны емысь [^дзлнстьйуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX Ua ыны еме [^дзлнстьйуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX Ua ыны емез [^дзлнстьйуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX Ua ыны еммы [^дзлнстьйуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX Ua ыны емзы [^дзлнстьйуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX Ua ыны емды [^дзлнстьйуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX Ua ыны емдэ [^дзлнстьйуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX Ua ыны емдэс [^дзлнстьйуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX Ua ыны емзэ [^дзлнстьйуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX Ua ыны емзэс [^дзлнстьйуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX Ua ыны емме [^дзлнстьйуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX Ua ыны еммес [^дзлнстьйуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX Ua ыны емпотонтэм [^дзлнстьйуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX Ua ыны емпотостэм [^дзлнстьйуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX Ua ыны емъёстэ [^дзлнстьйуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX Ua ыны и [^дзлнстьй]ыны		#  [^дзлнстьй]ыны
SFX Ua ыны ид [^дзлнстьй]ыны
SFX Ua ыны иды [^дзлнстьй]ыны
SFX Ua ыны из [^дзлнстьй]ыны
SFX Ua ыны изы [^дзлнстьй]ыны
SFX Ua ыны им [^дзлнстьй]ыны
SFX Ua ыны имы [^дзлнстьй]ыны
SFX Ua ыны исез [^дзлнстьй]ыны
SFX Ua ыны ись/Ud [^дзлнстьй]ыны
SFX Ua ыны иськиз [^дзлнстьй]ыны
SFX Ua ыны исько [^дзлнстьй]ыны
SFX Ua ыны иськод [^дзлнстьй]ыны
SFX Ua ыны иськоды [^дзлнстьй]ыны
SFX Ua ыны иськом [^дзлнстьй]ыны
SFX Ua ыны иськомы [^дзлнстьй]ыны
SFX Ua ыны исьтэм [^дзлнстьй]ыны
SFX Ua ыны иськем [^дзлнстьй]ыны
SFX Ua ыны иськеммы [^дзлнстьй]ыны
SFX Ua ыны иллям [^дзлнстьй]ыны
SFX Ua ыны иллямды [^дзлнстьй]ыны
SFX Ua ыны иллямзы [^дзлнстьй]ыны
SFX Ua ыны иллямтэ [^дзлнстьй]ыны
SFX Ua ыны иськы [^дзлнстьй]ыны
SFX Ua ыны иське [^дзлнстьй]ыны
SFX Ua ыны иськымтэе [^дзлнстьй]ыны
SFX Ua ыны иськымтэмы [^дзлнстьй]ыны
SFX Ua ыны э [дзлнстуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны 	 #  [дзлнстуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX Ua ыны элэ [дзлнстуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX Ua ыны эмед [дзлнстуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX Ua ыны эм/Ud [дзлнстуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX Ua ыны эмын [дзлнстуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX Ua ыны эмен [дзлнстуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX Ua ыны эмысь [дзлнстуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX Ua ыны эме [дзлнстуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX Ua ыны эмез [дзлнстуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX Ua ыны эмзы [дзлнстуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX Ua ыны эмды [дзлнстуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX Ua ыны эмзэ [дзлнстуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX Ua ыны эмзэс [дзлнстуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX Ua ыны эмдэ [дзлнстуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX Ua ыны эмдэс [дзлнстуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX Ua ыны эмме [дзлнстуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX Ua ыны эммес [дзлнстуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX Ua ыны эммы [дзлнстуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX Ua ыны эмпотонтэм [дзлнстуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX Ua ыны эмпотостэм [дзлнстуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX Ua ыны эмъёстэ [дзлнстуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX Ua ыны ӥ [дзлнст]ыны			#  [дзлнст]ыны
SFX Ua ыны ӥд [дзлнст]ыны
SFX Ua ыны ӥды [дзлнст]ыны
SFX Ua ыны ӥз [дзлнст]ыны
SFX Ua ыны ӥзы [дзлнст]ыны
SFX Ua ыны ӥм [дзлнст]ыны
SFX Ua ыны ӥмы [дзлнст]ыны
SFX Ua ыны ӥсез [дзлнст]ыны
SFX Ua ыны ӥсь/Ud [дзлнст]ыны
SFX Ua ыны ӥськиз [дзлнст]ыны
SFX Ua ыны ӥсько [дзлнст]ыны
SFX Ua ыны ӥськод [дзлнст]ыны
SFX Ua ыны ӥськоды [дзлнст]ыны
SFX Ua ыны ӥськом [дзлнст]ыны
SFX Ua ыны ӥськомы [дзлнст]ыны
SFX Ua ыны ӥсьтэм [дзлнст]ыны
SFX Ua ыны ӥськем [дзлнст]ыны	
SFX Ua ыны ӥськеммы [дзлнст]ыны
SFX Ua ыны ӥллям [дзлнст]ыны
SFX Ua ыны ӥллямды [дзлнст]ыны	
SFX Ua ыны ӥллямзы [дзлнст]ыны
SFX Ua ыны ӥллямтэ [дзлнст]ыны
SFX Ua ыны ӥськы [дзлнст]ыны	
SFX Ua ыны ӥське [дзлнст]ыны	
SFX Ua ыны ӥськымтэе [дзлнст]ыны
SFX Ua ыны ӥськымтэмы [дзлнст]ыны
SFX Ua ыны о [^ьй]ыны			#  [^ь]ыны
SFX Ua ыны од [^ьй]ыны
SFX Ua ыны оды [^ьй]ыны
SFX Ua ыны оз [^ьй]ыны
SFX Ua ыны озы [^ьй]ыны
SFX Ua ыны ом [^ьй]ыны
SFX Ua ыны омы [^ьй]ыны
SFX Ua ыны онлэсь [^ьй]ыны
SFX Ua ыны онтэм [^ьй]ыны
SFX Ua ыны онэз [^ьй]ыны
SFX Ua ыны 0 [ьуеыаоэяиюӧӥё]ыны
SFX Ua ыны ы [^й]ыны
SFX Ua ыны 0 [уеыаоэяиюӧӥё][цклгшхфвпржмбдзнтсчщӝӵӟ]ыны
SFX Ua ьыны ён/Ud ьыны
SFX Ua ьыны ёно ьыны				#  ьыны
SFX Ua ьыны е ьыны			
SFX Ua ьыны елэ ьыны
SFX Ua ьыны ем/Ud ьыны
SFX Ua ьыны емед ьыны
SFX Ua ьыны емын ьыны
SFX Ua ьыны емен ьыны
SFX Ua ьыны емысь ьыны
SFX Ua ьыны еме ьыны
SFX Ua ьыны емез ьыны
SFX Ua ьыны емзы ьыны
SFX Ua ьыны емды ьыны
SFX Ua ьыны емзэ ьыны
SFX Ua ьыны емзэс ьыны
SFX Ua ьыны емдэ ьыны
SFX Ua ьыны емдэс ьыны
SFX Ua ьыны емме ьыны
SFX Ua ьыны еммес ьыны
SFX Ua ьыны еммы ьыны
SFX Ua ьыны емпотонтэм ьыны
SFX Ua ьыны емпотостэм ьыны
SFX Ua ьыны емъёстэ ьыны
SFX Ua ьыны и ьыны
SFX Ua ьыны ид ьыны
SFX Ua ьыны иды ьыны
SFX Ua ьыны из ьыны
SFX Ua ьыны изы ьыны
SFX Ua ьыны им ьыны
SFX Ua ьыны имы ьыны
SFX Ua ьыны исез ьыны
SFX Ua ьыны ись/Ud ьыны
SFX Ua ьыны иськиз ьыны
SFX Ua ьыны исько ьыны
SFX Ua ьыны иськод ьыны
SFX Ua ьыны иськоды ьыны
SFX Ua ьыны иськом ьыны
SFX Ua ьыны иськомы ьыны
SFX Ua ьыны исьтэм ьыны
SFX Ua ьыны иськем ьыны	
SFX Ua ьыны иськеммы ьыны
SFX Ua ьыны иллям ьыны
SFX Ua ьыны иллямды ьыны	
SFX Ua ьыны иллямзы ьыны
SFX Ua ьыны иллямтэ ьыны
SFX Ua ьыны иськы ьыны	
SFX Ua ьыны иське ьыны	
SFX Ua ьыны иськымтэе ьыны
SFX Ua ьыны иськымтэмы ьыны
SFX Ua ьыны ё ьыны
SFX Ua ьыны ёд ьыны
SFX Ua ьыны ёды ьыны
SFX Ua ьыны ёз ьыны
SFX Ua ьыны ёзы ьыны
SFX Ua ьыны ём ьыны
SFX Ua ьыны ёмы ьыны
SFX Ua ьыны ёнлэсь ьыны
SFX Ua ьыны ёнтэм ьыны
SFX Ua ьыны ёнэз ьыны		
SFX Ua ны мон [^й]ыны		# ыны
SFX Ua ны мтэ [^й]ыны
SFX Ua ны мтэзэ [^й]ыны
SFX Ua ны мтэдэ [^й]ыны
SFX Ua ны мтэез [^й]ыны
SFX Ua ны са [^й]ыны
SFX Ua ны сал [^й]ыны
SFX Ua ны салыд [^й]ыны
SFX Ua ны салыз [^й]ыны
SFX Ua ны салмы [^й]ыны
SFX Ua ны салды [^й]ыны
SFX Ua ны салзы [^й]ыны
SFX Ua ны тэк [^й]ыны
SFX Ua ны ку [^й]ыны
SFX Ua ны кум [^й]ыны
SFX Ua ны кумы [^й]ыны
SFX Ua ны куд [^й]ыны
SFX Ua ны куды [^й]ыны
SFX Ua ны куз [^й]ыны
SFX Ua ны кузы [^й]ыны
SFX Ua ны тозь [^й]ыны
SFX Ua ны тозям [^й]ыны
SFX Ua ны тозямы [^й]ыны
SFX Ua ны тозяд [^й]ыны
SFX Ua ны тозяды [^й]ыны
SFX Ua ны тозяз [^й]ыны
SFX Ua ны тозязы [^й]ыны
SFX Ua ны мтэен [^й]ыны
SFX Ua ны мтэысь [^й]ыны
SFX Ua ны лэм [^й]ыны
SFX Ua ны лэме [^й]ыны
SFX Ua ны лэмме [^й]ыны

SFX Ub Y 152 	# -йыны
SFX Ub йыны ъён/Ud [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны	#  [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны ъёно [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны ъе [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны ъелэ [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны ъем/Ud [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны ъемен [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны ъемын [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны ъемед [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны ъемысь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны ъеме [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны ъемез [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны ъемзы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны ъемды [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны ъемзэ [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны ъемзэс [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны ъемдэ [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны ъемдэс [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны ъемме [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны ъеммес [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны ъеммы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны ъемпотонтэм [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны ъемпотостэм [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны ъемъёстэ [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub ыны и [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub ыны ид [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub ыны иды [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub ыны из [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub ыны изы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub ыны им [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub ыны имы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub ыны исез [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub ыны ись/Ud [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub ыны иськиз [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub ыны исько [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub ыны иськод [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub ыны иськоды [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub ыны иськом [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub ыны иськомы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub ыны исьтэм [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub ыны иськем [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны	
SFX Ub ыны иськеммы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub ыны иллям [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub ыны иллямды [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны	
SFX Ub ыны иллямзы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub ыны иллямтэ [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub ыны иськы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны	
SFX Ub ыны иське [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны	
SFX Ub ыны иськымтэе [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub ыны иськымтэмы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны ъё [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны ъёд [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны ъёды [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны ъёз [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны ъёзы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны ъём [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны ъёмы [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны ъёнлэсь [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны ъёнтэм [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны ъёнэз [^уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны ён [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны	#  [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны ёно [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны е [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны елэ [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны ем/Ud [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны емен [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны емед [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны емез [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны емысь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны емын [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны еме [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны емзы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны емды [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны емзэ [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны емзэс [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны емдэс [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны емдэ [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны емме [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны еммес [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны еммы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны емпотонтэм [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны емпотостэм [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны емъёстэ [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны и [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны ид [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны иды [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны из [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны изы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны им [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны имы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны исез [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны ись/Ud [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны иськиз [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны исько [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны иськод [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны иськоды [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны иськом [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны иськомы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны исьтэм [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны иськем [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны иськеммы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны иллям [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны иллямды [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны	
SFX Ub йыны иллямзы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны иллямтэ [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны иськы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны	
SFX Ub йыны иське [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны	
SFX Ub йыны иськымтэе [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны иськымтэмы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны ё [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны ёд [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны ёды [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны ёз [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны ёзы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны ём [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны ёмы [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны ёнлэсь [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны ёнтэм [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub йыны ёнэз [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub ыны 0 [уеыаоэяиюёӧӥ]йыны
SFX Ub ыны ы йыны
SFX Ub ны мон йыны			# ыны
SFX Ub ны мтэ йыны
SFX Ub ны мтэзэ йыны
SFX Ub ны мтэдэ йыны
SFX Ub ны мтэез йыны
SFX Ub ны са йыны
SFX Ub ны сал йыны
SFX Ub ны салыд йыны
SFX Ub ны салыз йыны
SFX Ub ны салмы йыны
SFX Ub ны салды йыны
SFX Ub ны салзы йыны
SFX Ub ны тэк йыны
SFX Ub ны ку йыны
SFX Ub ны кум йыны
SFX Ub ны кумы йыны
SFX Ub ны куд йыны
SFX Ub ны куды йыны
SFX Ub ны куз йыны
SFX Ub ны кузы йыны
SFX Ub ны тозь йыны
SFX Ub ны тозям йыны
SFX Ub ны тозямы йыны
SFX Ub ны тозяд йыны
SFX Ub ны тозяды йыны
SFX Ub ны тозяз йыны
SFX Ub ны тозязы йыны
SFX Ub ны мтэен йыны
SFX Ub ны мтэысь йыны
SFX Ub ны лэм йыны
SFX Ub ны лэме йыны
SFX Ub ны лэмме йыны
